lexc-files/prs-num/participial-oblique.txt
!=====================================
LEXICON IntrPtcpObl
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive participial-oblique
!=====================================
!--------------------|----------------------|---------------------|
^[4Sg]:^mi   Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^nga  Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^ten Enclitic;
^[4Pl]:^meng Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^kut  Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^si  Enclitic;
^[4Du]:^mek  Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^kung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^tek Enclitic;
!--------------------|----------------------|---------------------|

!===================================
LEXICON TrnsPtcpObl
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive participial-oblique 
!===================================
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^gka               Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^nka             Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^gka              Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^vut               Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^put             Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^gput             Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^vung              Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^pung            Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^gpung            Enclitic;
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^n                 Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^ten             Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^gken             Enclitic;
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^zi                Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^si              Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^gsi              Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^yek               Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^tek             Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^gtek             Enclitic;
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}minigu     Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}miniki   Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:^%{.f.%}minikek   Enclitic; ! anywhere, but all of the observed
^[4Pl.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteggu   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtek   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:^%{.f.%}megtekek  Enclitic; ! 4th person forms drop the -e
^[4Du.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}megnegu    Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}megneki  Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:^%{.f.%}megnekek  Enclitic; ! in the transitive participial
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! no [1--.1--] forms                                                                                               |
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^vnga              Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^fkut            Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^pekung           Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^fsinga            Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^pesikut         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^pesikung         Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^petegnenga        Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^petegnekut      Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^petegnekung      Enclitic;
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}mininga    Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}minikut  Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:^%{.f.%}minikung  Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}megtengnga Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}megtekut Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:^%{.f.%}megtekung Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}megnenga   Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}megnekut Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:^%{.f.%}megnekung Enclitic;
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}mken       Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}msi      Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^%{.f.%}mtek      Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}mken       Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}msi      Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^%{.f.%}mtek      Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}mken       Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}msi      Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^%{.f.%}mtek      Enclitic;
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! no [2--.2--] forms                                                                                               |
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}miniten    Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}minisi   Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:^%{.f.%}minitek   Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}miniten    Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}minisi   Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:^%{.f.%}minitek   Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}miniten    Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}minisi   Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:^%{.f.%}minitek   Enclitic;
|-------------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
